Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3613
City or village; schedule public hearing; presentation by county.

Not less than twenty days after receiving the notice provided for in section 23-3612, the city or village governing body shall schedule a public hearing for consideration of the county proposal for development of the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants. At such hearing, the county shall present its plans for the proposed development for the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants and the governing body of the city or village shall receive public comment on the matter.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 13.